Louisiana, session 2026, HB1055.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart E of Part III of Chapter 7 of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1664.21 and 1664.22, is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
SUBPART E. LOUISIANA URBAN SEARCH AND RESCUE PROGRAM
§1664.21. Urban search and rescue program
A. The Louisiana Urban Search and Rescue Program, referred to in this
Subpart as the "program", is hereby established and shall be administered by the
office of state fire marshal within the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
B. The program shall exercise the functions of the state regarding the
development, coordination, response, and provision of resources to locate and
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1460 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1055
extricate victims entrapped by man-made or natural disasters, as well as conducting
other operations within the boundaries of this state or in coordinated response with
other states or with the federal government. The program shall function in addition
to other disaster and emergency response efforts and shall not supplant those efforts.
C.(1) The state fire marshal shall select a director of the program to
administer and oversee the program.
(2) The state fire marshal shall employ a person, who shall report directly to
the director, to assist the director with the administrative requirements associated
with the establishment and maintenance of the program.
(3) The director may employ other personnel as needed to conduct the
operations of the program, including personnel overseeing urban search and rescue
operations, planning, and logistics. The office of state fire marshal shall provide
technical, clerical, and administrative assistance for the program and any necessary
office space and facilities, including training facilities and warehouses for equipment
and personnel, and any other services and support necessary for the program to
perform its functions.
D.(1) The office of state fire marshal shall develop policies and procedures
for the program, including but not limited to all of the following aspects of the
program:
(a) Organizational and decision-making processes to establish lines of
authority and control, goals, and objectives required to accomplish the missions of
the program response teams.
(b) Membership of the response teams.
(c) Staffing for administration of the program and for the response teams.
(d) Participation and qualification requirements of response team members,
including but not limited to training, meeting times, skills and abilities, removals,
and resignations.
(e) Uniforms and equipment.
(f) Discipline and professional conduct of response teams.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1460 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1055
(g) Operations related to response teams, including but not limited to
mobilization, deployment, and bases of operation.
(h) Any other issues concerning the operation of the program.
(2) The office of state fire marshal shall promulgate administrative rules and
regulations for the program, including but not limited to all of the following:
(a) Procedures for the reimbursement of agencies participating in the
program for expenses related to response team deployment.
(b) Any other issues concerning the operation of the program.
§1664.22. Urban search and rescue program fund
A. The Louisiana Urban Search and Rescue Program fund, referred to in this
Subpart as the "fund", is hereby created within the state treasury.
B. The source of monies deposited into the fund shall be legislative
appropriation. Monies in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the legislature
and shall be available exclusively for the administration of the Louisiana Urban
Search and Rescue Program.
C. All unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end of the
fiscal year shall remain in the fund. These monies shall be invested by the state
treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund, and interest earned
on the investment of these monies shall be credited to the fund after compliance with
the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana,
relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund.